Washington statutes.
RCW 39.96.050

Payments—Credit enhancements.

(1) Subject to any covenants or agreements applicable to the obligations issued or incurred by the governmental entity, any payments required to be made by the governmental entity under a payment agreement entered into in connection with the issuance, incurring, or carrying of those obligations may be made from money set aside or pledged to pay or secure the payment of those obligations or from any other legally available source.

(2) Any governmental entity may enter into credit enhancement, liquidity, line of credit, or other similar agreements in connection with, or incidental to, the execution of a payment agreement. The credit enhancement, liquidity, line of credit, or other similar agreement may include those payment, term, security, default, remedy, termination, and other terms and conditions, and may be with those parties, as the governmental entity deems reasonably necessary or desirable.

[ 1993 c 273 s 5.]